District of Columbia statutes.
47-2884.07

License—Enforcement of part; annual report; records of licensee; appeal of action, decision, or ruling of Mayor.

(a)

The provisions of this part shall be enforced by the Mayor, and the Council of the District of Columbia is authorized to make such rules and regulations in addition hereto and not inconsistent herewith, as may be necessary for the enforcement of this part. The Mayor shall make such examination and investigations of the affairs, business, office, and records of every licensee, and such further examinations or investigations as he shall deem necessary for the purpose of discovering violations of this part or of securing information necessary for its proper enforcement. For the purpose of making such examinations or investigations, the Mayor and his duly designated representatives shall have authority to require by subpoena the production of books, papers, and records and the attendance, and examination under oath, of all persons whomsoever whose testimony they may require relative to the loans or business of any such licensee, and shall have free access to the accounts, papers, records, files, safes, vaults, offices, and places of business used in connection with any business conducted under any license issued in accordance with this part. In the event of contumacy or refusal to obey any such subpoena or requirement under this section, the Mayor may make application to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for an order requiring obedience thereto. Thereupon the Court, with or without notice and hearing, as it in its discretion may decide, may make such order as is proper and may punish as a contempt any failure to comply with such order.

(b)

Each licensee shall annually, on or before the 15th day of March, file with the Mayor a report giving such information as the Mayor may require, relevant to the business and operations during the preceding calendar year of each licensed place of business conducted by such licensee in the District. Such report shall be made under oath and in the form prescribed by the Mayor. The Mayor shall make and publish annually an analysis and recapitulation of such reports.

(c)

Each licensee shall keep and use in his business and shall preserve, for at least 3 years after making the final entry on any loan recorded therein, such books, accounts, records, or card systems as will enable the Mayor to determine whether such licensee is complying with the provisions of this part and with the rules and regulations made pursuant thereto.

(d)

The Mayor is authorized to appoint such assistants, clerks, or other employees as may be required for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this part.

(e)

Any person aggrieved by any action, decision, or ruling of the Mayor under this part may, within 20 days thereafter, or within 20 days after the service upon such person of any written decision and findings required by this part, appeal to the Mayor for a review thereof. Upon any such review, the Mayor may affirm, set aside, or modify such action, decision, or ruling. In any such case the Mayor shall, within 10 days thereafter, prepare a written decision and findings with respect thereto, containing a summary of the evidence and the reasons supporting the affirmance, setting aside, or modification, and forthwith serve upon the aggrieved person a copy thereof.

Aug. 6, 1956, 70 Stat. 1039, ch. 970, § 7
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a), 164(m)
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(71) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.
1973 Ed., § 2-2007.
1981 Ed., § 2-1907.
This section is referenced in § 47-2884.01.